Tennessee, session 114, SB0513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-811(c), is amended by deleting
the language "June 30, 2025" and substituting instead the language "June 30, 2028".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0513
002438
- 1 -